Nevada, session 83, SB311.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 598 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An alarm company that, pursuant to a contract with a
customer of the alarm company, has installed an alarm system at
the home or business of the customer and charges the customer a
monthly fee to perform monitoring services shall, not later than 5
business days after receiving notice from the customer that the
alarm system is defective or inoperative:
(a) Repair or replace the alarm system or any component
thereof that is defective or inoperative; or
(b) Cancel the remainder of the contract and refund to the
customer any unearned money paid in advance or as a deposit.
2. An alarm company who cancels a contract pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall not charge the customer a
penalty, fee, forfeiture of deposit or any other additional cost
because of the cancellation. A customer whose contract is
cancelled pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 is not liable
for payment for any services after the effective date of the
cancellation.
3. Any violation of this section constitutes a deceptive trade
practice for the purpose of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Alarm company” means a person who engages in the
sale, installation, service, maintenance, repair or replacement of
an alarm system or the provision of monitoring services.
(b) “Alarm system” means a device or system that transmits an
audible, visual or electronic signal intended to summon or alert a
public safety agency.
(c) “Monitoring services” means receiving signals indicating
the activation of an alarm system and notifying a public safety
agency of that information for the purpose of summoning a
response from the public safety agency.
(d) “Public safety agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
Sec. 2. The provisions of section 1 of this act apply to
contracts entered into on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB311_R1*